Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2192.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 21-5414 is hereby amended to read as follows: 21-
5414. (a) Domestic battery is:
(1) Knowingly or recklessly causing bodily harm to a person with
whom the offender is involved or has been involved in a dating
relationship or a family or household member; or
(2) knowingly causing physical contact with a person with whom the
offender is involved or has been involved in a dating relationship or a
family or household member, when done in a rude, insulting or angry
manner.
(b) Aggravated domestic battery is:
(1) Knowingly impeding the normal breathing or circulation of the
blood by applying pressure on the throat, neck or chest of a person with
whom the offender is involved or has been involved in a dating
relationship or a family or household member, when done in a rude,
insulting or angry manner; or
(2) knowingly impeding the normal breathing or circulation of the
blood by blocking the nose or mouth of a person with whom the offender
is involved or has been involved in a dating relationship or a family or
household member, when done in a rude, insulting or angry manner.
(c) (1) Domestic battery is:
(A) Except as provided in subsection (c)(1)(B) or (c)(1)(C), a class B
person misdemeanor and the offender shall be sentenced to not less than
48 consecutive hours nor more than six months' imprisonment and fined

HB 2192—Am. by SC 2
not less than $200, nor more than $500 or in the court's discretion the court
may enter an order which requires the offender to undergo a domestic
violence offender assessment conducted by a certified batterer intervention
program and follow all recommendations made by such program. As a
condition of any grant of probation, suspension of sentence or parole
or of any other release, the offender shall be required to undergo a
domestic violence offender assessment conducted by a certified
batterer intervention program and follow all recommendations made
by such program, unless otherwise ordered by the court;
(B) except as provided in subsection (c)(1)(C), a class A person
misdemeanor, if, within five years immediately preceding commission of
the crime, an offender is convicted of domestic battery a second time and
the offender shall be sentenced to not less than 90 days nor more than one
year's imprisonment and fined not less than $500 nor more than $1,000.
The five 90 days' imprisonment mandated by this paragraph may be served
in a work release program only after such offender has served 48 45
consecutive hours' {20} days' imprisonment, provided if such work release
program requires such offender to return to confinement at the end of each
day in the work release program. The offender shall serve at least five 45
consecutive {20} days' imprisonment before the offender is granted
probation, suspension or reduction of sentence or parole or is otherwise
released. As a condition of any grant of probation, suspension of sentence
or parole or of any other release, the offender shall be required to undergo
a domestic violence offender assessment conducted by a certified batterer
intervention program and follow all recommendations made by such
program, unless otherwise ordered by the court; and
(C) a person felony, if, within five years immediately preceding
commission of the crime, an offender is convicted of domestic battery a
third or subsequent time, and the offender shall be sentenced to not less
than 90 days nor more than one year's imprisonment and fined not less
than $1,000 nor more than $7,500. The offender convicted shall not be
eligible for release on probation, suspension or reduction of sentence or
parole until the offender has served at least 90 days' imprisonment shall
serve at least 90 consecutive days' imprisonment before the offender is
granted probation, suspension or reduction of sentence or parole or is
otherwise released. As a condition of any grant of probation, suspension of
sentence or parole or of any other release, the offender shall be required to
undergo a domestic violence offender assessment conducted by a certified
batterer intervention program and follow all recommendations made by
such program, unless otherwise ordered by the court. If the offender does
not undergo a domestic violence offender assessment conducted by a
certified batterer intervention program and follow all recommendations
made by such program, the offender shall serve not less than 180 days nor

HB 2192—Am. by SC 3
more than one year's imprisonment. The 90 days' imprisonment mandated
by this paragraph may be served in a work release program only after such
offender has served 48 consecutive hours imprisonment, provided such
work release program requires such offender to return to confinement at
the end of each day in the work release program.
(2) Aggravated domestic battery is a severity level 7, person felony.
(d) In determining the sentence to be imposed within the limits
provided for a first, second, third or subsequent offense under this section,
a court shall consider information presented to the court relating to any
current or prior protective order issued against such person.
(e) As used in this section:
(1) "Dating relationship" means a social relationship of a romantic
nature. In addition to any other factors the court deems relevant, the trier
of fact may consider the following when making a determination of
whether a relationship exists or existed: Nature of the relationship, length
of time the relationship existed, frequency of interaction between the
parties and time since the termination of the relationship, if applicable;
(2) "family or household member" means persons 18 years of age or
older who are spouses, former spouses, parents or stepparents and children
or stepchildren, and persons who are presently residing together or who
have resided together in the past, and persons who have a child in common
regardless of whether they have been married or who have lived together
at any time. "Family or household member" also includes a man and
woman if the woman is pregnant and the man is alleged to be the father,
regardless of whether they have been married or have lived together at any
time; and
(3) "protective order" means:
(A) A protection from abuse order issued pursuant to K.S.A. 60-3105,
60-3106 or 60-3107, and amendments thereto;
(B) a protective order issued by a court or tribunal of any state or
Indian tribe that is consistent with the provisions of 18 U.S.C. § 2265;
(C) a restraining order issued pursuant to K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 23-2707,
38-2243, 38-2244 or 38-2255, and amendments thereto, or K.S.A. 60-
1607, prior to its transfer;
(D) an order issued in this or any other state as a condition of pretrial
release, diversion, probation, suspended sentence, postrelease supervision
or at any other time during the criminal case or upon appeal that orders the
person to refrain from having any direct or indirect contact with a family
or household member;
(E) an order issued in this or any other state as a condition of release
after conviction or as a condition of a supersedeas bond pending
disposition of an appeal, that orders the person to refrain from having any
direct or indirect contact with another person; or

HB 2192—Am. by SC 4
(F) a protection from stalking order issued pursuant to K.S.A. 60-
31a05 or 60-31a06, and amendments thereto.
(f) For the purpose of determining whether a conviction is a first,
second, third or subsequent conviction in sentencing under subsection (c)
(1):
(1) "Conviction" includes being convicted of a violation of K.S.A.
21-3412a, prior to its repeal, this section or entering into a diversion or
deferred judgment agreement in lieu of further criminal proceedings on a
complaint alleging a violation of this section;
(2) "conviction" includes being convicted of a violation of a law of
another state, or an ordinance of any city, or resolution of any county,
which prohibits the acts that this section prohibits or entering into a
diversion or deferred judgment agreement in lieu of further criminal
proceedings in a case alleging a violation of such law, ordinance or
resolution;
(3) only convictions occurring in the immediately preceding five
years including prior to July 1, 2001, shall be taken into account, but the
court may consider other prior convictions in determining the sentence to
be imposed within the limits provided for a first, second, third or
subsequent offender, whichever is applicable; and
(4) it is irrelevant whether an offense occurred before or after
conviction for a previous offense.
(g) A person may enter into a diversion agreement in lieu of further
criminal proceedings for a violation of subsection (a) or (b) or an
ordinance of any city or resolution of any county which prohibits the acts
that subsection (a) or (b) prohibits only twice during any five-year period.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 21-5414 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book Kansas register.